Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska21-2436
Associate, defined.

Associate, when used to indicate a relationship with any person, shall mean any of the following: (1) Any corporation, limited liability company, or organization of which the person is an officer, director, member, or partner or is, directly or indirectly, the owner of ten percent or more of any class of voting stock; (2) any trust or estate in which the person has at least a ten percent beneficial interest or as to which the person serves as trustee or personal representative or in a similar fiduciary capacity; and (3) any relative or spouse of the person, or any relative of the spouse, who has the same residence as such person.

Laws 1988, LB 1110, § 6;

Laws 1993, LB 121, § 160.